Nebraska, session 109, LB1014.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1014 LB1014
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 21-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-193 (1)(a) (1) Notice of organization, amendment of the
certificate of organization, merger, conversion, or domestication must
be:
(i) Published published three successive weeks in some legal
newspaper of general circulation near the designated office of the
limited liability company; or .
(ii) Electronically published on the web page described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A notice of organization must show the information required by
subsection (b) of section 21-117 to be stated in the certificate of
organization.
(c) A brief resume of any amendment of the certificate of
organization or of any merger, conversion, or domestication of the
limited liability company shall be published in the same manner and for
the same period of time as notice of organization is required to be
published.
(2)(a) The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain an easy-
to-use and publicly accessible web page on the Secretary of State's
website for the electronic publication of notices of organization,
amendment of the certificate of organization, merger, conversion, or
domestication of limited liability companies.
(b) The web page shall allow members of the public to view, search,
and retrieve published notices at no cost.
(c) The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of twenty dollars at
the time a notice is published on the web page from the publisher. The
Secretary of State shall retain an amount of such fees sufficient to
cover the administrative costs incurred by the Secretary of State in
developing, operating, and maintaining the web page described in this
subsection. The Secretary of State shall remit the remaining balance of
-2-

LB1014 LB1014
2026 2026
the fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit the
remaining balance of the fees to the Innovation Hub Cash Fund.
(d) The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this subsection.
(3) (2) Whenever any limited liability company is voluntarily
dissolved, notice of the dissolution shall be published as required by
section 21-150.
(4) (3) Proof of publication of any of the notices shall be filed in
the office of the Secretary of State. In the event any notice described
in subsection (1) of this section and required to be given pursuant to
this section is not given, but is subsequently published as described in
subsection (1) of this section for the required time, and proof of the
publication thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State, the
acts of the limited liability company prior to, as well as after, such
publication shall be valid.
Sec. 2. Original section 21-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-